District of Columbia statutes.
50-2203.03

Immoderate speed not dependent on legal rate of speed.

In any prosecution under § 50-2203.01 or § 50-2203.02, whether the defendant was driving at an immoderate rate of speed shall not depend upon the rate of speed fixed by law for operating such vehicle.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 802(c)
June 17, 1935, 49 Stat. 385, ch. 266
1981 Ed., § 40-715.
1973 Ed., § 40-608.